Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB467.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Release of Project 70 restrictions on certain lands and imposition of Project 70 restrictions on other land.(a) Authorization.--In accordance with the requirements of section 20(b) of the act of June 22, 1964 (Sp.Sess. 1, P.L.131, No.8), known as the Project 70 Land Acquisition and Borrowing Act, the General Assembly authorizes the release of Project 70 restrictions on land owned by the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, and formerly owned by the Borough of West Mifflin, <--123456789101112131415161718192021 Allegheny County, which is more particularly described in subsection (b), in exchange for the imposition of Project 70 restrictions on land, which is more particularly described in subsection (c).(b) Lands to be released from Project 70 restrictions.--The lands to be released from Project 70 restrictions are as follows:TRACT 1:ALL THOSE CERTAIN tracts or parcels of land situated in the Borough of Dravosburg and the Borough of West Mifflin, County of Allegheny, Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, being bound and described according to the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission Plan No. R/W 14S353, WBS No. M-052.50X002-4-02-98-60, dated June 28, 2023, and as follows to wit:FIRST:BEGINNING at a point on the line dividing lands now or formerly of the Borough of West Mifflin and lands of the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, formerly Blanche S. Paul, said point being located 614 feet, more or less, right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1899+28±;1. Thence along said dividing line, and continuing along the line dividing lands now or formerly of the Borough of West Mifflin and lands of the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, formerly Union Realty Company of Washington, the following eight (8) courses and distances:a. North 65º 33' 49" West, a distance of 69.69 feet to a point being located 556 feet, more or less, right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1898+85±;20250SB0467PN1181 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 b. By a curve to the left having a radius of 400.00 feet, an arc length of 113.93 feet, and a chord bearing of North 73º 43' 23" West, a chord distance of 113.55 feet to a point being located 472 feet, more or less, right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1898+05±;c. North 81º 52' 59" West, a distance of 166.14 feet to a point being located 366 feet, more or less, right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1896+78±;d. North 80º 21' 29" West, a distance of 210.80 feet to a point being located 227 feet, more or less, right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1895+19±;e. By a curve to the left having a radius of 350.00 feet, an arc length of 144.72 feet, and a chord bearing of South 87º 47' 47" West, a chord distance of 143.69 feet to a point being located 157 feet, more or less, right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1893+94±;f. South 75º 57' 01" West, distance of 125.78 feet to a point being located 119 feet, more or less, right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1892+74±;g. By a curve to the right having a radius of 450.00 feet, an arc length of 128.83 feet, and a chord bearing of South 84º 09' 07" West, a chord distance of 128.39 feet to a point being located 63.00 feet right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1891+58±;h. North 87º 38' 49" West, distance of 300.91 feet to a point being located 105.00 feet left of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1889+09±;20250SB0467PN1181 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 2. Thence through the lands now or formerly of the Borough of West Mifflin, the following seven (7) courses and distances:a. North 00º 12' 48" West, distance of 175.68 feet to a point being located 255.00 feet left of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1890+00.00;b. North 55º 40' 34" East, distance of 460.53 feet to a point being located 277.00 feet left of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1894+60.00;c. North 74º 33' 25" East, distance of 197.79 feet to a point being located 222.00 feet left of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1896+50.00;d. North 38º 05' 05" East, distance of 541.11 feet to a point being located 420.00 feet left of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1901+25.00;e. North 68º 12' 45" East, distance of 145.87 feet to a point being located 410.00 feet left of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1902+50.00;f. South 77º 51' 34" East, distance of 147.26 feet to a point being located 325.00 feet left of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1903+55.00;g. North 71º 08' 23" East, distance of 126.96 feet to a point on the line dividing lands now or formerly of the Borough of West Mifflin and the lands now or formerly Riverlift Industries, Inc. said point being located 321feet, more or less, left of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1904+68±;3. Thence along said dividing line, South 47º 39' 13" East, distance of 790.47 feet to a point being located 346 feet, more or less, right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1908+87±;20250SB0467PN1181 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 4. Thence through the lands now or formerly of the Borough of West Mifflin, the following four (4) courses and distances:a. South 13º 09' 43" West, a distance of 4.35 feet to a point being located 350.00 feet right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1908+85.00;b. South 41º 49' 41" West, a distance of 387.28 feet to a point being located 565.00 feet right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1905+10.00;c. South 82º 04' 46" West, a distance of 315.25 feet to a point being located 484.00 feet right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1901+25.00;d. South 22º 00' 51" West, distance of 207.16 feet to the point of BEGINNING.CONTAINING 25.616 Acres.SECOND:BEGINNING at a point on the northerly right-of-way line of Curry Hollow Road, said point being located 603 feet, more or less, right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1899+44±;1. Thence through the lands now or formerly of the Borough of West Mifflin, the following four (4) courses and distances:a. North 22º 00' 51" East, a distance of 189.65 feet to a point being located 484.00 feet right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1901+25.00;b. North 82º 04' 46" East, a distance of 315.25 feet to a point being located 565.00 feet right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1905+10.00;c. North 41º 49' 41" East, a distance of 387.28 feet to a point being located 350.00 feet right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1908+85.00;20250SB0467PN1181 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 d. North 13º 09' 43" East, a distance of 4.35 feet to a point on the line dividing lands now or formerly of the Borough of West Mifflin and lands now or formerly of Riverlift Industries, Inc., said point being located 346 feet, more or less, right of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1908+87±;2. Thence along said dividing line, the following four (4) courses and distances:a. South 47º 39' 13" East, distance of 551.14 feet to a point;b. North 43º 23' 35" East, a distance of 400.00 feet to a point;c. South 50º 26' 34" East, distance of 333.80 feet to a point;d. South 22º 58' 38" West, distance of 801.23 feet to a point on the northerly right-of-way line of Curry Hollow Road;3. Thence along said northerly right-of-way line of Curry Hollow Road, the following two (2) courses and distances:a. North 65º 04' 30" West, a distance of 66.60 feet to a point;b. By a curve to the left having a radius of 517.50 feet, an arc length of 191.42 feet, and a chord bearing of North 75º 40' 18" West, a chord distance of 190.33 feet to a point on the line dividing lands now or formerly of the Borough of West Mifflin and lands now or formerly of Copart of Connecticut, Inc.;4. Thence along said dividing line, North 65º 04' 31" West, distance of 234.38 feet to a point on the line dividing lands now or formerly of the Borough of West Mifflin and lands now or formerly of USX Corporation;5. Thence along said dividing line, South 51º 12' 04" West, 20250SB0467PN1181 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distance of 102.21 feet to a point on the northerly right-of-way line of Curry Hollow Road;Thence along said northerly right-of-way line of Curry Hollow Road, the following four (4) courses and distances:a. By a curve to the right having a radius of 232.50 feet, an arc length of 57.55 feet, and a chord bearing of North 53º 15' 18" West, a chord distance of 57.40 feet to a point;b. North 46º 09' 49" West, a distance of 117.45 feet to a point;c. By a curve to the left having a radius of 317.50 feet, an arc length of 107.51 feet, and a chord bearing of North 55º 51' 49" West, a chord distance of 106.99 feet to a point;d. North 65º 33' 49" West, distance of 563.51 feet to the point of BEGINNING.CONTAINING 19.811 Acres.BEING the same property which the Borough of West Mifflin, by deed dated August 15, 2023 and recorded August 25, 2023 in the Department of Real Estate Office in and for Allegheny County, Pennsylvania, in Deed Book Volume 19410, Page 116, granted and conveyed unto the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission.TRACT 2:ALL THAT CERTAIN tract or parcel of land situated in West Mifflin Borough, County of Allegheny, Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, being bound and described according to the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission Plan No. R/W 14S354, WBS No. M-052.50X002-4-02-98-61, dated July 15, 2020, and as follows to wit:BEGINNING at a point on the line dividing lands now or formerly of The Borough of West Mifflin, a municipal corporation and lands of Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, formerly Peter R. 20250SB0467PN1181 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Kusko and Lynda M. Kusko, said point being located 351 feet, more or less, left of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1987+20±;1. Thence along said dividing line, South 52º 44' 21" East, a distance of 511.10 feet to a point on the line dividing the lands; 2. Thence through the lands now or formerly of The Borough of West Mifflin, a municipal corporation, the following two (2) courses and distances:a. South 10º 37' 39" West, a distance of 702.07 feet to a point;b. South 22º 20' 20" West, a distance of 321.16 feet to a point on the westerly Required Right-of-Way for Limited Access line;3. Thence through the lands now or formerly of The Borough of West Mifflin, a municipal corporation the following five (5) courses and distances:a. North 04º 23' 32" West, a distance of 173.79 feet to a point being located 198.00 feet left of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1975+12.00;b. North 21º 04' 38" East, a distance of 260.52 feet to a point being located 155 feet, more or less, left of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1978+06±;c. North 3º 01' 37" West, a distance of 320.72 feet to a point being located 170 feet, more or less, left of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1981+54±;d. North 4º 18' 32" West, a distance of 147.51 feet to a point being located 171 feet, more or less, left of and opposite SR 0043 Survey and Right-of-Way Baseline Station 1983+02±;e. North 27º 22' 35" West, a distance of 455.45 feet to the 20250SB0467PN1181 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Point of Beginning.CONTAINING 3.212 Acres.BEING a portion of the same property which the Duquesne Light Company, a corporation, by deed dated May 10, 1967 and recorded May 12, 1967, in the Department of Real Estate Office of and for Allegheny County, Pennsylvania, in Deed Book Volume 4391, Page 201, granted and conveyed unto the Borough of West Mifflin, a municipal corporation, the grantor herein.(c) Land subject to imposition of Project 70 restrictions.--The land owned by the Borough of West Mifflin, Allegheny County, on which Project 70 restrictions are to be imposed, is as follows:ALL THAT CERTAIN piece or parcel of land situate in West Mifflin Borough, Allegheny County and Commonwealth of Pennsylvania being known as Lot 1 of the West Mifflin School District Plan of Consolidation and Subdivision, prepared by Civil & Environmental Consultants, Inc. as Project Mo. 195-450.SV01, dated December 2019, revised February 25, 2020 and recorded in Plan Book Volume 307, Page 83 in the Allegheny County Department of Real Estate, more particularly bounded and described as follows:BEGINNING at a point on the dividing line of Lot 1 and Lot 2 in said plan, said point being on the easterly Right-of-Way line of Camp Hollow Road, also known as SR-02101, having a width of 60 feet; thence along said dividing line, North 56º 42' 44" East a distance of 320.43 feet to a point; thence continuing along the same, North 32º 47' 08" West, a distance of 206.51 feet to a point on the southerly line of lands now or formerly Bell Telephone Company of Pennsylvania, recorded in Deed Book Volume 5094, Page 701; thence along said lands and along lands now or 20250SB0467PN1181 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 formerly Richard J. and Mary Odato, recorded in Deed Book Volume 10943, Page 276, also being known as Lot 1 of the Richard J. Odato Plan of Lots, recorded in Plan Book Volume 167, Page 72, North 74º 59' 05" East, a distance of 264.63 feet to a point; thence along said Lot 1 of the Richard J. Odato Plan of Lots the following (4) four courses and distances: 1) North 14º 44' 12" East, a distance of 91.67 feet to a point; 2) North 38º 19' 42" East, a distance of 91.01 feet to a point; 3) North 75º 22' 42" East, a distance of 199.07 feet to a point; 4) North 61º 58' 56" East, a distance of 54.15 feet to a concrete monument on the westerly Right-of-Way line of Curry Hollow Road, having a width of 25 feet; thence along said Right-of-Way Line, by the arc of a circle curving to the left, having a radius of 577.10 feet and arc length of 61.96 feet, subtended by a chord bearing, South 21º 31' 17" East, a chord distance of 61.93 feet; thence continuing along said Right-of-Way line and along lands now or formerly Robert and Hatti V. Topolnak recorded in Deed Book Volume 9847, Page 74, also being known as Lot 4 of the V. V. Klein Plan of Lots, recorded in Plan Book Volume 70, Page 26, along lands now or formerly Dominic E. Garella, recorded in Deed Book Volume 10995, Page 427, also being known as Lot 2 and 3 of the V. V. Klein Plan of Lots, along lands now or formerly William R. Irwin, Jr. and Carole Irwin, being known as Lot 1 of the V. V. Klein Plan of Lots, and along lands now or formerly William R. Irwin Jr. and James T. Irwin, recorded in Deed Book Volume 11246, Page 179, South 19º 19' 33" East, passing a distance of 458.53 feet to a rebar at the point of intersection of said Lot 1 and Lot 2 of the V.V. Klein Plan of lots and said lands of Irwin, having a total distance of 942.71 feet to a point; thence along said lands of Irwin, along the westerly line 20250SB0467PN1181 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of Cherry Lane (unopened), and along lands now or formerly PSPC, Inc., recorded in Deed Book Volume 13799, Page 158, South 19º 46' 27" East, a distance of 1,064.20 feet to a point the Right-of-Way line of said Camp Hollow Road thence along said Right-of-Way line, North 62º 47' 17" West, a distance of 35.43 feet to a point; thence North 13º 47' 18" West, a distance of 48.97 feet to a point; thence North 54º 28' 48" West, a distance of 79.19 feet to a point; thence South 27º 14' 12" West, a distance of 48.38 feet to a point on the Right-of-Way line of said Camp Hollow Road; thence along said Right-of-Way line the following (10) ten courses and distances: 1) North 62º 46' 46" West, a distance of 550.91 feet to a point; 2) by the arc of a circle curving to the right having a radius of 1,607.28 feet, an arc length of 288.52 feet, subtended by a chord bearing, North 57º 38' 13" West, a chord distance of 288.13 feet; 3) by the arc of a circle curving to the right having a radius of 50.15 feet, an arc length of 76.60 feet, subtended by a chord bearing North 07º 47' 47" West, a chord distance of 69.37 feet; 4) by the arc of a circle curving to the right having a radius of 51.80 feet an arc length of 80.88 feet, subtended by a chord bearing, North 80º 45' 44" East, a chord distance of 72.91 feet to a point; 5) North 35º 29' 34" East, a distance of 8.50 feet to a point; 6) North 54º 30' 26" West, a distance of 141.30 feet to a point; 7) South 35º 29' 34" West, a distance of 8.50 feet to a point; 8) by the arc of a circle curving to the right having a radius of 39.62 feet, an arc length of 62.61 feet, subtended by a chord bearing, South 09º 14' 09" East, a chord distance of 56.30 feet to a point; 9) by the arc of a circle curving to the right having a radius of 49.82 feet, an arc length of 83.63 feet, subtended by a chord bearing South 84º 02' 06" West, a chord 20250SB0467PN1181 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distance of 74.15 feet to a point; 10) by the arc of a circle curving to the right having a radius of 1,607.28 feet, an arc length of 859.60 feet, subtended by a chord bearing, North 31º 41' 50" West, a chord distance of 849.39 feet to the point of BEGINNING.CONTAINING 1,251,985 square feet or 28.741 acres, more or less.BEING the same premises which the School District of Borough of West Mifflin, n/k/a West Mifflin Area School District by deed dated April 16, 2021 and recorded April 22, 2021 in the Department of Real Estate in and for Allegheny County, Pennsylvania in Deed Book Volume 18407, Page 382, granted and conveyed unto the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission.ALSO, BEING the same premises which the School District of Borough of West Mifflin, n/k/a West Mifflin Area School District by Corrective Deed dated June 11, 2021 and recorded June 29, 2021 in the Department of Real Estate in and for Allegheny County, Pennsylvania in Deed Book Volume 18492, Page 501, granted and conveyed unto the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission.(d) Deed clause.--Project 70 restrictions shall be imposed on the land described in subsection (c) by the following deed clause:This Indenture is given to provide land for recreation, conservation and historical purpose, as said purposes are defined in the "Project 70 Land Acquisition and Borrowing Act" approved June 22, 1954, P.L. 131.(e) Conditions.--The conveyances described in this section shall be subject to all lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes and rights of others, including, but not confined to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, 20250SB0467PN1181 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electric, gas or pipeline company, as well as under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.Section 2. Conveyance in Rush Township, Schuylkill County.(a) Authorization.--The Department of General Services, with notice to the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, is authorized on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to grant and convey to the White Birch Golf Course and Restaurant certain lands situate in Rush Township, Schuylkill County. The purchase price shall be $1. Any conveyance under this act shall be made under terms and conditions to be established in an agreement of sale.(b) Property description.--The lands to be conveyed under subsection (a) consist of certain State park land located in Tuscarora State Park in Rush Township, Schuylkill County, having a length of approximately 500 feet and a width of approximately 100 feet, together with improvements thereon, used historically as a customer parking lot for the White Birch Golf Course and Restaurant and described in Land Use Agreement Number UA-101 made June 13, 1989, by and between the Bureau of State Parks and the White Birch Golf Course, Inc.(c) Existing encumbrances.--The conveyance authorized by this section shall be made under and subject to existing encroachments, all lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes and rights of others, including, but not confined to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, as well as under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of 20250SB0467PN1181 - 13 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Condition.--The conveyance authorized by this section shall be made under and subject to the condition, which shall be contained in the deed of conveyance, that no portion of the property conveyed shall be used as a licensed facility, as the term is defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions), or any other similar type of facility authorized under State law. The condition shall be a covenant running with the land and shall be binding upon the grantee and the heirs and assigns of the grantee. If the grantee or the heirs or assigns of the grantee permit any portion of the property authorized to be conveyed in this section to be used in violation of this subsection, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the grantor.(e) Easements.--(1) The Secretary of General Services may retain any easement from the property to be conveyed in accordance with this section as the Secretary of General Services deems necessary or appropriate.(2) The Secretary of General Services may grant any future easement to benefit the property to be conveyed in accordance with this section, as agreed to between the property owner and the Department of General Services.(f) Costs and fees.--Costs and fees incidental to this conveyance shall be borne by the grantee.(g) Time for conveyance and alternate disposition.--If the conveyance authorized by this section is not executed within two years after the effective date of this subsection, the property may be disposed of in accordance with section 2405-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative 20250SB0467PN1181 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Code of 1929.(h) Proceeds.--The proceeds from the conveyance authorized in this section shall be deposited into a fund under the jurisdiction of, and as prescribed by, the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.Section 3. Effective date.SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0467PN1181 - 15 - <--12345678